District of Columbia statutes.
34-1561

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Advanced Metering Infrastructure” or “AMI” means a system capable of providing 2-way communication with metering equipment to gather at least hourly energy consumption data on a daily basis for all customers.

(2)

“ARRA” means the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, approved February 17, 2009 (123 Stat. 115; 26 U.S.C. § 1, note).

(3)

“Commission” means the Public Service Commission.

(4)

“Customer” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 34-1501(12).

(5)

“Electric company” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 34-207.

(6)

“Meter Data Management System” means a system that provides a single data repository which can gather data from multiple metering systems and then supply that data to multiple applications such as billing, forecasting, customer service, system operation and maintenance.

(7)

“Regulatory asset” means specific costs that a public utility may defer to its balance sheet and accrue earnings thereon at its authorized rate of return.

(8)

“Smart Grid” means the installation of advanced technology to enhance the operation of the electric distribution and transmission system.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2161, 57 DCR 181

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Advanced Metering Infrastructure Implementation and Cost Recovery Authorization Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-107, June 18, 2009, 56 DCR 4929).
For temporary (90 day) additions, see §§ 2001, 2002 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2161 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2161 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Emergency Legislation

Short title: Section 2160 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle Q of title II of the act may be cited as the “Advanced Metering Infrastructure Implementation and Cost Recovery Authorization Act of 2009”.

Short Title